Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3121.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22-11-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 22-11 entitled "Joint
Committee on Legislative Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
22-11-1. Permanent committee — Composition.
There is created a permanent joint committee on legislative services consisting of the
president, majority, and the minority leader leaders of the senate, the majority and minority leaders
from the house of representatives, and the speaker of the house of representatives. The members of
the committee shall serve until their successors have been duly elected and qualified.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006094
========